en: Potty Seats
xx: Potty Seats
cs: Nočníky
da: Pottesæder til toilet
de: Töpfchen
es: Adaptadores de inodoro
fr: Pots pour enfants
it: Tavolette WC per bambini
ja: おまる・補助便座
nl: Postoeltjes
no: Barnetoalettseter
pl: Nocniki
pt: Troninhos
ru: Детские горшки
sv: Pottsitsar
tr: Lazımlıklar

en: Potty Training Kits
xx: Potty Training Kits
cs: Sady k učení na nočník
da: Pottetræningssæt
de: Töpfchentrainingsets
es: Kits para el control de esfínteres
fr: Kits d'apprentissage de la propreté
it: Kit di addestramento al vasino
ja: トイレトレーニング用品
nl: Kits voor zindelijkheidstraining
no: Pottetreningssett
pl: Zestawy do treningu czystości
pt: Kits de desfralde
ru: Наборы для приучения к горшку
sv: Kit för potträning
tr: Tuvalet Eğitim Setleri

en: Swaddling & Receiving Blankets
xx: Swaddling & Receiving Blankets
cs: Zavinovačky
da: Babysvøb
de: Puckdecken
es: Sacos y mantas para bebés
fr: Couvertures d'emmaillotage et couvertures pour bébés
it: Coperte per fasciatura
ja: おくるみ用毛布
nl: Inbaker- en omslagdoeken
no: Svøpetepper og barnetepper
pl: Beciki i kocyki niemowlęce
pt: Cueiros para enrolar bebês
ru: Одеяла для пеленания
sv: Lindningsfiltar och bebisfiltar
tr: Kundaklar

en: Receiving Blankets
xx: Receiving Blankets
cs: Dětské dečky
da: Babytæpper
de: Einschlagdecken
es: Mantas para recién nacidos
fr: Langes
it: Coperte avvolgi bebè
ja: 湯上り用おくるみ
nl: Babydekens
no: Babytepper
pl: Kocyki dla niemowląt
pt: Mantas
ru: Одеяла для новорожденных
sv: Babyfiltar
tr: Bebek Battaniyeleri

en: Swaddling Blankets
xx: Swaddling Blankets
cs: Zavinovací přikrývky
da: Svøb
de: Einschlagdecken & Puckdecken
es: Mantas envolventes
fr: Couvertures d'emmaillotage
it: Copertine per fasciare
ja: おくるみ・ベビーブランケット
nl: Inbakerdoeken
no: Svøpetepper
pl: Beciki
pt: Cueiros
ru: Пеленальные одеяла
sv: Swaddles
tr: Kundak Battaniyeleri

en: Religious & Ceremonial
xx: Religious & Ceremonial
cs: Náboženské a obřadní zboží
da: Religiøst og ceremonielt
de: Religion & Feierlichkeiten
es: Elementos religiosos y ceremoniales
fr: Offices religieux et cérémonies
it: Articoli religiosi e per cerimonie
ja: 冠婚葬祭・宗教
nl: Religieus en ceremonieel
no: Religiøst og seremonielt
pl: Artykuły religijne i dewocjonalia
pt: Material para cerimônias e eventos religiosos
ru: Товары для церемоний и религиозных обрядов
sv: Religion och ceremonier
tr: Din ve Törenler

en: Memorial Ceremony Supplies
xx: Memorial Ceremony Supplies
cs: Potřeby pro vzpomínkové akce
da: Ting til mindeceremoni
de: Artikel für Gedenkzeremonien
es: Artículos para ceremonias conmemorativas
fr: Fournitures ecclésiastiques
it: Articoli per cerimonie commemorative
ja: 葬儀用品
nl: Benodigdheden voor herdenkingsplechtigheden
no: Utstyr til minneseremonier
pl: Artykuły pogrzebowe
pt: Artigos para funerais
ru: Товары для мемориальных церемоний
sv: Material till minnesceremonier
tr: Anma Töreni Malzemeleri

en: Memorial Urns
xx: Memorial Urns
cs: Kremační urny
da: Ceremoniel urne
de: Urnen
es: Urnas funerarias
fr: Urnes funéraires
it: Urne memoriali
ja: 骨壷
nl: Herdenkingsurnen
no: Minneurner
pl: Urny
pt: Urnas crematórias
ru: Мемориальные урны
sv: Minnesurnor
tr: Kül Saklama Küpleri

en: Religious Items
xx: Religious Items
cs: Náboženské potřeby
da: Religiøse ting
de: Religiöse Artikel
es: Artículos religiosos
fr: Objets religieux
it: Articoli religiosi
ja: 宗教関連用具
nl: Religieuze artikelen
no: Religiøse gjenstander
pl: Artykuły religijne
pt: Itens religiosos
ru: Культовые товары
sv: Religiösa objekt
tr: Dini Eşyalar

en: Prayer Beads
xx: Prayer Beads
cs: Modlitební korálky a růžence
da: Bedeperler
de: Gebetsketten
es: Rosarios
fr: Chapelets
it: Grani per rosario
ja: 数珠・ロザリオ
nl: Gebedskralen
no: Rosenkranser
pl: Różańce
pt: Rosários
ru: Четки
sv: Radband
tr: Dua Tespihleri

en: Prayer Cards
xx: Prayer Cards
cs: Modlitební karty
da: Bedekort
de: Gebetskarten
es: Tarjetas de oración
fr: Cartes de prières
it: Santini
ja: ホーリーカード
nl: Bidprentjes
no: Bønnekort
pl: Obrazki do modlitwy
pt: Santinhos
ru: Открытки с молитвами
sv: Bönkort
tr: Dua Kartları

en: Religious Altars
xx: Religious Altars
cs: Náboženské oltáře
da: Religiøse altre
de: Altare
es: Altares religiosos
fr: Autels religieux
it: Altari religiosi
ja: 祭壇
nl: Religieuze altaren
no: Religiøse altere
pl: Ołtarzyki
pt: Altares religiosos
ru: Религиозные алтари
sv: Religiösa altare
tr: Dini Sunaklar

en: Religious Veils
xx: Religious Veils
cs: Náboženské závoje
da: Religiøse slør
de: Religiöse Schleier
es: Velos religiosos
fr: Voiles religieux
it: Veli religiosi
ja: 宗教用ベール
nl: Religieuze hoofddoeken
no: Religiøse slør
pl: Nakrycia głowy i zasłony twarzy
pt: Véus religiosos
ru: Накидки для культовых церемоний
sv: Religiösa slöjor
tr: Başörtüleri

en: Tarot Cards
xx: Tarot Cards
cs: Tarotové karty
da: Tarotkort
de: Tarotkarten
es: Cartas de tarot
fr: Cartes de tarot
it: Tarocchi
ja: タロットカード
nl: Tarotkaarten
no: Tarotkort
pl: Karty do tarota
pt: Cartas de tarô
ru: Карты таро
sv: Tarotkort
tr: Tarot Kartları

en: Wedding Ceremony Supplies
xx: Wedding Ceremony Supplies
cs: Potřeby pro svatební obřad
da: Ting til bryllup
de: Artikel für Hochzeitszeremonien
es: Artículos para ceremonias nupciales
fr: Fournitures de mariage
it: Articoli per cerimonia di nozze
ja: 結婚式用品
nl: Benodigdheden voor huwelijken
no: Utstyr til bryllupsseremonier
pl: Artykuły ślubne
pt: Artigos para cerimônia de casamento
ru: Свадебные товары
sv: Material till bröllopsceremonier
tr: Düğün Malzemeleri

en: Aisle Runners
xx: Aisle Runners
cs: Běhouny
da: Dekorative løbere
de: Hochzeitsläufer
es: Alfombras nupciales
fr: Tapis de passage
it: Tappeto nuziale
ja: アイルランナー
nl: Rode lopers
no: Løpere
pl: Dywany ślubne
pt: Passadeiras para casamentos
ru: Декоративные дорожки для прохода в церкви
sv: Bröllopsmattor för mittgång i kyrka
tr: Gelin Yolu Halıları

en: Flower Girl Baskets
xx: Flower Girl Baskets
cs: Košíčky pro družičky
da: Blomsterpigekurve
de: Körbe für Blumenmädchen
es: Cestas para flores
fr: Paniers de bouquetière
it: Cestini per i fiori
ja: フラワーガール用バスケット
nl: Manden voor bloemenmeisjes
no: Blomsterjente-kurver
pl: Koszyki dla druhen
pt: Cestas de flores
ru: Цветочницы
sv: Blomsterkorgar till brudnäbbar
tr: Düğün Çiçek Sepetleri

en: Ring Pillows & Holders
xx: Ring Pillows & Holders
cs: Polštářky na prsteny
da: Puder til ringe
de: Ringkissen
es: Cojines para anillos
fr: Coussins et porte-alliances
it: Custodie e cuscinetti per fedi
ja: リングピロー
nl: Ringkussens
no: Ringputer og -holdere
pl: Poduszki na obrączki
pt: Almofadas para alianças
ru: Подушки для колец
sv: Ringkuddar
tr: Yüzük Yastıkları ve Tutacakları

en: Hardware
xx: Hardware
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo
da: Isenkram
de: Heimwerkerbedarf
es: Bricolaje
fr: Quincaillerie
it: Articoli di ferramenta
ja: DIY用品
nl: Bouwmaterialen
no: Jernvare
pl: Sprzęt
pt: Ferragens
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия
sv: Metallprodukter
tr: Hırdavat

en: Building Consumables
xx: Building Consumables
cs: Stavební spotřební materiál
da: Forbrugsvarer til hjemmet
de: Baumaterial
es: Consumibles para construcción
fr: Consommables de construction
it: Materiali di consumo per costruzioni
ja: 建築用消耗品
nl: Verbruiksartikelen voor de bouw
no: Utstyr til byggearbeid
pl: Materiały eksploatacyjne dla budownictwa
pt: Consumíveis para construção
ru: Расходные строительные материалы
sv: Byggvaror
tr: Yapı Sarf Malzemeleri